Illinois, session 104th, HB2692.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Section 55-30 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/55-30 new)7    Sec. 55-30. State Procurement Diversity and Inclusion Task 8Force.9    (a) The State Procurement Diversity and Inclusion Task 10Force is hereby created. 11    (b) The Task Force shall study the underrepresentation of 12minorities, women, and persons with disabilities, and members 13of the LGBTQ+ community, with regard to corporate diversity 14and State of Illinois procurement opportunities and awards. 15The Task Force shall review the required business filings that 16require disclosure of a business entity's demographic makeup, 17the Business Enterprise Program, and the Illinois Procurement 18Code in an effort to identify areas for improvement that 19increase diversity and inclusion. 20    (c) The Task Force may request testimony from any person 21or entity that may assist in increasing understanding or 22solution-based ideologies that will improve representation and 23opportunities for minorities, women, persons with   HB2692- 2 -LRB104 09918 SPS 19988 b1disabilities, and LGBTQ+ persons within business entities and 2State procurement. 3    (d) The Task Force shall consist of the following members: 4        (1) the Secretary of State, or his or her designee, 5    who shall be the Chair of the Task Force; 6        (2) one member of the House of Representatives 7    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 8        (3) one member of the House of Representatives 9    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 10    Representatives; 11        (4) one member of the Senate appointed by the 12    President of the Senate; 13        (5) one member of the Senate appointed by the Minority 14    Leader of the Senate; 15        (6) two chief procurement officers of a State agency, 16    appointed by the Governor; and 17        (7) five members representing women-owned businesses, 18    businesses owned by a person with disability, 19    minority-owned businesses, LGBTQ+-owned businesses, 20    appointed one each by the Governor, the Speaker of the 21    House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, the 22    Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, and the 23    Minority Leader of the Senate. 24    (e) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 25compensation for the duration of the Task Force, but they may 26be reimbursed for reasonable travel expenses and in compliance   HB2692- 3 -LRB104 09918 SPS 19988 b1with the Secretary of State travel rules required for 2attendance at meetings. Vacancies in the Task Force shall be 3filled by the original appointing authority. 4    (f) As soon as practicable, but no later than September 1, 52025, all members shall be appointed to the Task Force. As soon 6as practicable after all members have been appointed, the Task 7Force shall hold its first meeting. The Task Force shall hold 8at least 5 meetings. 9    (g) The Office of the Secretary of State shall provide 10administrative and other support to the Task Force. 11    (h) The Task Force shall from time to time submit reports 12of its findings and recommendations on its work to the 13Governor and the General Assembly. By January 1, 2027, the 14Task Force shall submit a final report to the Governor and 15General Assembly containing its findings and recommendations. 16    (i) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028.  17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.